Hawaii statutes.
[§673-7] Limited remedy. This chapter
shall not be construed to limit or enlarge the scope of rights available under
any other claims, proceedings or other actions against the State, its officers
and employees, arising under chapter 662 or other provisions of law. [L 1988, c
395, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next